Maryland, session 2026, HB0091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
5–2A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0091*

HOUSE BILL 91
(b) “Certified applicator” has the meaning stated in § 5–201 of this title.
(C) (1) “ENVIRONMENTAL EMERGENCY” MEANS AN OCCURRENCE OF
ANY PEST WHICH PRESENTS:
(I) A SIGNIFICANT RISK OF HARM OR INJURY TO THE
ENVIRONMENT; OR
(II) A SIGNIFICANT HARM, INJURY, OR LOSS TO AGRICULTURAL
CROPS.
(2) “ENVIRONMENTAL EMERGENCY” INCLUDES THE PRESENCE OF
PESTS FOR WHICH THE SECRETARY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES,
DETERMINES NEED PREVENTIVE MEASURES TO AVERT A SIGNIFICANT RISK.
[(c)] (D) “Neonicotinoid pesticide” means any pesticide containing a chemical
belonging to the neonicotinoid class of chemicals, including:
(1) Imidacloprid;
(2) Nithiazine;
(3) Acetamiprid;
(4) Clothianidin;
(5) Dinotefuran;
(6) Thiacloprid;
(7) Thiamethoxam; and
(8) Any other chemical designated by the Department as belonging to the
neonicotinoid class of chemicals.
[(d)] (E) “Restricted use pesticide” has the meaning stated in § 5–201 of this title.
5–2A–02.
(c) On or after January 1, 2018, AND SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION, a person may not use a neonicotinoid pesticide unless the person is:
(1) A certified applicator or a person working under the supervision of a
certified applicator;

HOUSE BILL 91 3
(2) A farmer, or a person under the supervision of a farmer, who uses the
pesticide for agricultural purposes, including crop production, livestock, poultry, equine,
and noncrop agricultural fields; or
(3) A veterinarian.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PERSON MAY NOT DISTRIBUTE, SELL, OR USE ANY CORN, SOYBEAN, OR WHEAT SEEDS
COATED IN OR TREATED WITH A NEONICOTINOID PESTICIDE.
(2) (I) THE SECRETARY MAY TEMPORARILY SUSPEND THE
PROHIBITION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE SECRETARY, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, DETERMINES THAT:
1. THERE IS AN INSUFFICIENT AMOUNT OF
COMMERCIALLY AVAILABLE SEED THAT HAS NOT BEEN TREATED WITH A
NEONICOTINOID PESTICIDE; OR
2. COMPLIANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION WOULD RESULT IN AN UNDUE FINANCIAL HARDSHIP TO
AGRICULTURAL PRODUCERS.
(II) ANY TEMPORARY SUSPENSION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH
SHALL BE IN EFFECT FOR 1 YEAR, AFTER WHICH THE SECRETARY SHALL
RE–EVALUATE THE SUSPENSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS PARAGRAPH.
(III) THE SECRETARY SHALL PUBLISH A WRITTEN DIRECTIVE OF
ANY TEMPORARY SUSPENSION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH THAT SPECIFIES:
1. THE TYPE OF SEEDS AUTHORIZED UNDER THE
DIRECTIVE; AND
2. THE DATE BY WHICH THE SECRETARY WILL
RE–EVALUATE THE SUSPENSION.
(E) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) THE PRODUCTION OF AGRICULTURAL COMMODITIES; AND
(II) THE APPLICATION OF PESTICIDES BY A CERTIFIED
APPLICATOR TO TREAT INVASIVE SPECIES IN WOODY PLANTS.

HOUSE BILL 91
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PERSON MAY NOT USE A NEONICOTINOID PESTICIDE TO TREAT OUTDOOR
ORNAMENTAL PLANTS AND TURF.
(3) (I) THE SECRETARY MAY TEMPORARILY SUSPEND THE
PROHIBITION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE SECRETARY, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, DETERMINES THAT:
1. A VALID ENVIRONMENTAL EMERGENCY EXISTS;
2. A NEONICOTINOID PESTICIDE WOULD BE EFFECTIVE
IN ADDRESSING THE ENVIRONMENTAL EMERGENCY; AND
3. THERE IS NO OTHER LESS HARMFUL PESTICIDE OR
PEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICE THAT WOULD BE EFFECTIVE IN ADDRESSING THE
ENVIRONMENTAL EMERGENCY.
(II) THE SECRETARY SHALL PUBLISH A WRITTEN DIRECTIVE OF
ANY TEMPORARY SUSPENSION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH THAT SPECIFIES:
1. THE TYPE OF NEONICOTINOID PESTICIDE
AUTHORIZED UNDER THE DIRECTIVE; AND
2. THE DATE THROUGH WHICH THE DIRECTIVE APPLIES,
WHICH MAY NOT BE LONGER THAN 1 YEAR FROM THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE
DIRECTIVE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.